Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-105
Division; seal; rules and regulations; adopt.

The division shall adopt a seal and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its administration. All rules, regulations, and orders of the Department of Aeronautics adopted prior to July 1, 2017, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation pursuant to Laws 2017, LB339, shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 4, p. 82;

Laws 1955, c. 231, § 6, p. 719;

Laws 1976, LB 460, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 5.

For promulgation of administrative rules, see Chapter 84, article 9.

Department of Aeronautics has power to adopt rules and regulations in conformity, as nearly as may be, with federal regulations. In re Estate of Kinsey, 152 Neb. 95, 40 N.W.2d 526 (1949).